Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE F. COMMERCE AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT

CHAPTER 490A. TEXAS ENTREPRENEURSHIP NETWORK

Sec. 490A.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Entrepreneur participant" means an individual who has a business or an idea for a business and registers with the network.

(2) "Fund" means the Texas Entrepreneurship Network fund.

(3) "Network" means the Texas Entrepreneurship Network.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.001 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.002. ESTABLISHMENT OF NETWORK. (a) The Texas Entrepreneurship Network is established to develop and diversify the economy of this state through:

(1) the provision of programs and services to facilitate the growth and success of entrepreneurs; and

(2) the statewide, results-driven collaboration of public and private entities to create jobs and energize sustainable local economies through the development of entrepreneurs in this state.

(b) The Texas Center for Rural Entrepreneurship shall:

(1) operate the network under an agreement with the Department of Agriculture and as provided by this chapter; and

(2) comply with all reasonable and customary oversight measures required by the Department of Agriculture.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.002 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.003. MEMBERS OF NETWORK. (a) The founding members of the network are:

(1) the Texas Cooperative Extension of The Texas A&M University System;

(2) the IC2 Institute at The University of Texas at Austin;

(3) the College of Agricultural Sciences and Natural Resources at Texas Tech University;

(4) the Department of Agriculture;

(5) the Texas Workforce Commission;

(6) the Texas Department of Rural Affairs;

(7) the Texas Center for Rural Entrepreneurship;

(8) the Texas Economic Development Council;

(9) the Texas Center for Border Economic and Enterprise Development at The University of Texas Rio Grande Valley;

(10) the office of external affairs at Texas Southern University; and

(11) the John F. Baugh Center for Entrepreneurship and Free Enterprise at Baylor University.

(b) An institution of higher education, chamber of commerce, economic development corporation, business, or organization with an interest in promoting entrepreneurship may join the network.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (H.B. 1918), Sec. 92, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 188 (S.B. 1467), Sec. 12, eff. May 30, 2021.

Sec. 490A.004. ADVISORY BOARD. (a) The Texas Center for Rural Entrepreneurship shall establish an advisory board to guide and advise the operations of the network.

(b) The advisory board consists of one representative from each of the founding members of the network under Section 490A.003(a) and at least one member from the private sector. An organization other than a founding member of the network under Section 490A.003(a) may have a representative on the advisory board only if the creation of an additional seat on the board is authorized by a two-thirds majority vote of the existing board.

(c) The initial advisory board shall adopt provisions to determine the terms of board members and stagger the members' terms, and other provisions necessary to administer the board.

(d) Advisory board members serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred in traveling to meetings related to the network.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.004 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.002(4), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.005. GENERAL DUTIES AND GOALS. (a) The network shall train and refocus existing state and local resources to build a more prosperous, dynamic, and sustainable economy throughout this state by:

(1) providing coordinated training and services that enhance the value of the state's existing infrastructure investments and make the investments available to entrepreneur participants;

(2) developing a statewide network of entrepreneurship developers and entrepreneurship centers as provided by Section 490A.006;

(3) developing a comprehensive network of knowledge, leadership, and financial capital resources accessible through the network's entrepreneurship developers and entrepreneurship centers;

(4) educating entrepreneur participants and generating awareness of the network and its programs;

(5) identifying the most promising ventures through activities, including business-plan competitions, and assisting the ventures' potential for job and wealth creation;

(6) developing evaluation methods to measure the effectiveness of the network and the impact of entrepreneurship on local and regional economies;

(7) developing best practices for successful entrepreneurship and applied research regarding critical success factors for entrepreneurial businesses to provide a strategic competitive advantage for businesses in this state; and

(8) collaborating with existing local, state, and federal agencies and economic development professionals to use the strengths and assets of the agencies and professionals.

(b) The network shall work locally, regionally, and statewide with educators, agencies, organizations, networks, businesses, economic developers, consultants, communities, researchers, or other persons to develop and support strategies to assist entrepreneur participants and improve the environment for entrepreneurial development in this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.005 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.002(5), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.006. ENTREPRENEURSHIP SERVICES. (a) The network shall develop a statewide association of local individuals who are entrepreneurship developers trained to analyze, evaluate, and develop business plans and help local entrepreneur participants start, grow, or develop their businesses.

(b) The network may establish local entrepreneurship centers in every county practicable, at which an entrepreneur participant may access programs, necessary support, and online resources provided and developed by the network. In establishing the entrepreneurship centers, the network shall use existing infrastructure, public and private organizations, and other resources, including chambers of commerce, universities and community colleges, county extension offices, Texas Workforce Commission offices, and local business offices.

(c) The network shall adopt requirements for entrepreneurship centers. An organization must meet the requirements adopted under this subsection before hosting an entrepreneurship center.

(d) A group of individuals who have services, resources, or expertise to offer entrepreneur participants may agree to provide services through the network as an entrepreneurship force.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.006 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.007. NETWORK PROGRAMS. The network may develop:

(1) programs for:

(A) business plan development, competitive enhancement, and management skills development;

(B) entrepreneurship best practices training;

(C) entrepreneurship education in primary and secondary schools and community colleges;

(D) expanding entrepreneurship in workforce development programs;

(E) accessing sources of start-up and growth capital;

(F) training and assisting entrepreneurship agents who facilitate and assist entrepreneurial efforts; and

(G) community readiness preparation and evaluation, and community planning;

(2) methods for helping entrepreneur participants access other loan, guarantee, and grant programs;

(3) necessary policies and regulations; and

(4) collaborations with other entities.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.007 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.008. TEXAS ENTREPRENEURSHIP NETWORK FUND. (a) The Texas Entrepreneurship Network fund is an account in the general revenue fund. The Department of Agriculture shall administer the fund.

(b) The following amounts shall be deposited in the fund:

(1) any amounts appropriated by the legislature for the fund; and

(2) gifts, grants, and other donations received for the fund.

(c) The fund may be used only for network purposes, subject to Section 490A.009.

(d) The network may solicit and accept gifts and grants for the fund from public and private universities and all other public and private entities.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.008 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.002(6), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 490A.009. USE OF FUND. Money appropriated to the fund by the legislature shall be used for:

(1) programs related to local entrepreneurship centers, training, and entrepreneurship developers;

(2) curriculum development, infrastructure, data management, and research;

(3) technology and economic development research centers of excellence;

(4) the network's overhead expenses; and

(5) other activities necessary to accomplish the mission of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 593 (H.B. 1747), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 490.009 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(30), eff. September 1, 2007.